src/fst/morphology/affixes/clitics.lexc
!! # Veps clitics

LEXICON K
!! @LEXNAME@ 3 clitics plus #
! +Foc/ki:%-ki # ; ! "also"
  +Foc/ki:%-ki # ;
  +Foc/i:%>i # ;
  +Foc/žo:%-žo # ;
     +Qst:%-ik # ;
     +Qst:%-k # ;
               # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
